Massachusetts, session 194th, H502.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3D of chapter 23A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following subsection:-
(f) All EDIP contracts, as defined by section 3A of this chapter, awarded by the EACC to
a corporation, sole proprietorship, limited liability company, or partnership for a certified project,
as defined by said section 3A, shall include the requirement that, unless it declares bankruptcy as
defined by U.S.C. 11, a corporation, sole proprietorship, limited liability company, or partnership
shall forfeit or refund any credits or grants received pursuant to an EDIP contract if the
corporation, sole proprietorship, limited liability company, or partnership relocates outside the
commonwealth within 20 years. The office of the attorney general shall promulgate regulations
pursuant to the enforcement of this subsection.
of 1